Massachusetts, session 194th, S3229.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding and general or special law to the contrary and pursuant to 
section 5A of chapter 3 of the General Laws, the commonwealth, acting by and through the 
Massachusetts Department of Transportation, may take for highway purposes, certain parcels of 
land located in the city of Woburn and the town of Burlington, held in trust by the treasury of the 
city of Boston, being temporary construction areas of 4,603 square feet and permanent easements 
of 8,917 square feet and shown on a plan of land entitled “Massachusetts Department of 
Transportation Highway Division Intersection Improvement Project Cambridge Road at South 

of 2 8 Bedford Street and Bedford Road in the city and town of Woburn/Burlington, Middlesex County 
Preliminary Right of Way Plans”, on file with the chief engineer of the division of highways of 
the Massachusetts Department of Transportation and recorded with the Middlesex north registry 
of deeds.  
SECTION 2. In anticipation of and as planned mitigation for the takings described in 
section 1 of this act and to ensure no-net-loss of land subject to Article 97 of the Amendments to 
the Constitution of the Commonwealth, the town of Burlington required that land be set aside for 
future improvements to the intersection of Cambridge road at South Bedford street and Bedford 
road and Wheeler Self Storage, LLC conveyed a conservation restriction to the town of 
Burlington on the Wheeler Road property containing approximately 9 acres, which restriction is 
recorded with the Middlesex south registry of deeds at book 78014, page 433, as stipulated 
during the May 25, 2025 approval by the town of Burlington of a special permit to Jumbo Self 
Storage, LLC - Jumbo Capital Management for land located at 7 Wheeler road in the town of 
Burlington and shown on the town of Burlington assessor's map 52, parcels 4 and 6 and  
described in conditions G and H of said certain special permit decision granted by the town of 
Burlington planning board recorded with the Middlesex south registry of deeds at book 71169 
and page 469.  
SECTION 3. The Massachusetts Department of Transportation shall assume all costs 
associated with engineering, surveys, appraisals, deed preparation and other expenses necessary 
to execute the takings authorized by this act.  
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon its passage.